Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Substance Abuse Prevention

15A.340.
Kentucky Agency for Substance Abuse Policy (KY-ASAP) — Organization — Purpose — Oversight by Office of Drug Control Policy — Members of KY-ASAP Board — Duties of board.

As used in this section and KRS

15A.342

and

15A.344

, “KY-ASAP” means the Kentucky Agency for Substance Abuse Policy.

The Office of Drug Control Policy shall administer an endowment from interest generated through funds appropriated or gifts, donations, or funds received from any source. The Office of Drug Control Policy may expend endowment principal, if necessary in its discretion, to carry out the purposes of this section and KRS

15A.342

and

15A.344

. These expenditures from the endowment principal are hereby appropriated for this purpose.

The Office of Drug Control Policy shall oversee the activities specified in this section and KRS

15A.342

and

15A.344

and provide administrative support to the seventeen (17) member KY-ASAP Board, which is created to oversee the activities of KY-ASAP. Membership of the board shall be appointed by the Governor and shall consist of the following:

One (1) member representing the Kentucky Family Resource Youth Services Coalition, or a designee;

One (1) member representing the Kentucky Health Department Association, or a designee;

The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or designee;

The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, or a designee;

One (1) member representing the Division of Behavioral Health within the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities, Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or a designee;

The commissioner of the Department for Public Health, Cabinet for Health and Family Services, or a designee;

The commissioner of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control, or a designee;

The commissioner of the Department of Education;

The director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, or a designee;

One (1) member representing the Kentucky Association of Regional Programs, or a designee;

One (1) member representing the Kentucky Heart Association, or a designee;

One (1) member representing the Kentucky Lung Association, or a designee;

One (1) member representing the Kentucky Cancer Society, or a designee;

Two (2) members representing local tobacco addiction and substance abuse advisory and coordination boards; and

Two (2) members representing private community-based organizations, whether for-profit or nonprofit, with experience in programs involving smoking cessation or prevention or alcohol or substance abuse prevention and treatment.

Members shall serve for a term of four (4) years, may be reappointed, and may serve no more than two (2) consecutive terms. Members shall not be compensated but shall receive reimbursement for expenses incurred while performing board business.

The board shall meet at least quarterly. A quorum of nine (9) members shall be required for the transaction of business. Meetings shall be held at the call of the chair, or upon the written request of two (2) members to the chair.

The board shall:

Oversee deposits and expenditures from the endowment;

Request, in its discretion, an audit relating to the expenditure of endowment funds;

Receive quarterly reports from the commissioner of the Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control regarding KY-ASAP’s activities;

Progress toward development and implementation of the strategic plan;

Recommend to KY-ASAP the most efficient means for using public funds to coordinate, supplement, and support high quality and ongoing programs of all public agencies and private service providers related to smoking cessation and prevention and alcohol and substance abuse prevention and treatment;

Recommend matters for review and analysis by KY-ASAP; and

Perform other duties as necessary for the oversight of KY-ASAP.

The Office of Drug Control Policy and KY-ASAP shall promote the implementation of research-based strategies that target Kentucky’s youth and adult populations.

The Office of Drug Control Policy and KY-ASAP shall vigorously pursue the philosophy that tobacco in the hands of Kentucky’s youth is a drug abuse problem because of the addictive qualities of nicotine, and because tobacco is the most prevalent gateway drug that leads to later and escalated drug and alcohol abuse.

History.

Repealed and reenact., Acts 2007, ch. 85, § 10, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 20, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 146, § 3, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 5, effective July 12, 2012.

15A.342.
Duties of Office of Drug Control Policy and KY-ASAP — Authority for administrative regulations — Reports.

The Office of Drug Control Policy shall be responsible for all matters relating to the research, coordination, and execution of drug control policy and for the management of state and federal grants, including but not limited to the prevention and treatment related to substance abuse. By December 31 of each year, the Office of Drug Control Policy shall review, approve, and coordinate all current projects of any substance abuse program which is conducted by or receives funding through agencies of the executive branch. This oversight shall extend to all substance abuse programs which are principally related to the prevention or treatment, or otherwise targeted at the reduction, of substance abuse in the Commonwealth. The Office of Drug Control Policy shall promulgate administrative regulations consistent with enforcing this oversight authority. In addition, the Office of Drug Control Policy and KY-ASAP shall:

Develop a strategic plan to reduce the prevalence of smoking and drug and alcohol abuse among both the youth and adult populations in Kentucky;

Monitor the data and issues related to youth alcohol and tobacco access, smoking cessation and prevention, and substance abuse policies, their impact on state and local programs, and their flexibility to adapt to the needs of local communities and service providers;

Make policy recommendations to be followed to the extent permitted by budgetary restrictions and federal law, by executive branch agencies that work with smoking cessation and prevention and alcohol and substance abuse issues to ensure the greatest efficiency in agencies and to ensure that a consistency in philosophy will be applied to all efforts undertaken by the administration in initiatives related to smoking cessation and prevention and alcohol and substance abuse;

Identify existing resources in each community that advocate or implement programs for smoking cessation or prevention, or drug and alcohol abuse prevention, education, or treatment;

Encourage coordination among public and private, state and local, agencies, organizations, and service providers, and monitor related programs;

Act as the referral source of information, utilizing existing information clearinghouse resources within the Department for Public Health and CHAMPIONS for a Drug Free Kentucky Office, relating to youth tobacco access, smoking cessation and prevention, and substance abuse prevention, cessation, and treatment programs. The Office of Drug Control Policy and KY-ASAP shall identify gaps in information referral sources;

Search for grant opportunities for existing programs within the Commonwealth;

Make recommendations to state and local agencies and local tobacco addiction and substance abuse advisory and coordination boards;

Observe programs from other states;

Coordinate services among local and state agencies, including but not limited to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Department of Agriculture, the Public Protection Cabinet, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and the Education and Labor Cabinet;

Ensure the availability of training, technical assistance, and consultation to local service providers for programs funded by the Commonwealth that provide services related to tobacco addiction, smoking cessation or prevention, or alcohol or substance abuse;

Review existing research on programs related to smoking cessation and prevention and substance abuse prevention and treatment;

Comply with any federal mandate regarding smoking cessation and prevention and substance abuse, to the extent authorized by state statute;

Establish a mechanism to coordinate the distribution of funds to support any local prevention, treatment, and education program based on the strategic plan developed in subsection (1) of this section that could encourage smoking cessation and prevention through efficient, effective, and research-based strategies;

Oversee a school-based initiative that links schools with community-based agencies and health departments to implement School Programs to Prevent Tobacco Use, based upon the model recommended by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. To the extent permitted by resources, the initiative shall involve input by and services from each of the family resource and youth services centers, regional prevention centers, and existing school-based antidrug programs;

Work with community-based organizations to encourage them to work together to establish comprehensive tobacco addiction and substance abuse prevention education programs and carry out the strategic plan developed in this section. These organizations shall be encouraged to partner with district and local health departments and community mental health centers to plan and implement interventions to reach youths before tobacco addiction and substance abuse become a problem in their lives;

Coordinate media campaigns designed to demonstrate the negative impact of smoking and the increased risk of tobacco addiction, substance abuse, and the development of other disease in children, young people, and adults. To accomplish this objective, KY-ASAP shall work with local media to reach all segments of the community quickly and efficiently;

Certify to the Governor, the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and the General Assembly during the budget request process established under KRS Chapter 48 the extent to which each entity receiving state funds has cooperated with the Office of Drug Control Policy and KY-ASAP, coordinated with community resources, and vigorously pursued the philosophy of the Office of Drug Control Policy and KY-ASAP;

Promulgate, with the approval of the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, any administrative regulations necessary to implement this section and KRS

15A.340

and

15A.344

; and

Report annually to the Legislative Research Commission and Governor regarding the proper organization of state government agencies that will provide the greatest coordination of services, and report semiannually to the Legislative Research Commission and Governor on the status of the Office of Drug Control Policy and KY-ASAP programs, services, and grants, and on other matters as requested by the Legislative Research Commission and Governor.

History.

Repealed and reenact., Acts 2007, ch. 85, § 11, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 11, § 7, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 21, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 236, § 15, effective July 1, 2022.

15A.344.
County tobacco addiction and alcohol and substance abuse advisory and coordination boards — Role of KY-ASAP — Local long-term community strategy.

KY-ASAP shall establish in each county a local tobacco addiction and alcohol and substance abuse advisory and coordination board to assist in planning, overseeing, and coordinating the implementation of local programs related to smoking cessation and prevention and alcohol and substance abuse prevention, cessation, and treatment, although a single board may be established for multiple counties to ensure a comprehensive range of services. The board shall assist with the coordination of programs provided by public and private entities. If the existing programs of private service providers are of high quality, KY-ASAP shall concentrate on providing missing elements and support for those providers. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall support the communities’ efforts.

KY-ASAP shall consult with community leaders to solicit the names of residents from the community to serve on each advisory and coordination board. KY-ASAP shall request from each board the submission of reasonable reports on the effectiveness, efficiency, and efforts of each local program, including recommendations for increased or decreased funding, and KY-ASAP shall supply information as necessary to the advisory and coordination board to enable it to carry out its functions.

KY-ASAP shall provide incentives to encourage multicounty advisory and coordination board requests and shall establish a single board to represent all counties making the request. Priority in establishing a board shall be given to existing regional prevention centers or coalitions, community organizations, or local Kentucky Incentives for Prevention (KIP) project coalitions. Membership shall consist of residents from each of the counties.

Each advisory and coordination board shall develop a long-term community strategy that is designed to reduce the incidence of youth and young adult smoking and tobacco addiction, promote resistance to smoking, reduce the incidence of substance abuse, and promote effective treatment of substance abuse. All county resources, both private and public, for-profit and nonprofit, shall be considered in developing this strategy.

Employers, local leaders, schools, family resource and youth services centers, health care providers and institutions, economic developers, and other relevant local and regional entities shall be consulted in the development of the strategy.

An assessment of needs and available services shall be included in the strategy.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 536, §
27, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, §
75, effective June 20, 2005; repealed and reenact., Acts 2007, ch. 85, § 12, effective June 26, 2007.

15A.350.
Motorcycle safety education program — Standards — Administrative regulations. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 1, effective July 1, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 51, effective June 26, 2007; 2018 ch. 39, § 1, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 188, § 3, effective June 29, 2021; renumbered to KRS §

176.5061

by 2021 ch. 190, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

15A.352.
Motorcycle rider training courses — Exemption from motorcycle driver’s license skill test. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 2, effective July 1, 2005; 2018 ch. 39, § 2, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 188, § 4, effective June 29, 2021; renumbered to KRS §

176.5062

by 2021 ch. 190, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

15A.354.
Instructors — Requirements for approval — Approval of nonresidents — Review of status every two years. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 3, effective July 1, 2005; 2018 ch. 39, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2021 ch. 188, § 5, effective June 29, 2021; renumbered to KRS §

176.5063

by 2021 ch. 190, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

15A.356.
Powers of cabinet. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 4, effective July 1, 2005; renumbered to KRS §

176.5064

by 2021 ch. 190, § 4, effective June 29, 2021.

15A.358.
Motorcycle safety education program fund. [Renumbered]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 5, effective July 1, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 52, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 100, § 36, effective January 1, 2019; 2018 ch. 39, § 5, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 39, § 6, effective January 1, 2019; renumbered to KRS §

176.5065

by 2021 ch. 190, § 5, effective June 29, 2021.

15A.360.
Revenues relating to motorcycle safety education program fund — Report. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 6, effective July 1, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 53, effective June 26, 2007; renumbered to KRS §

176.5066

by 2021 ch. 190, § 6, effective June 29, 2021.

15A.362.
Motorcycle Safety Education Commission — Membership — Terms — Meetings — Commission attached to Office of Highway Safety within the Department of Highways for administrative purposes. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 7, effective July 1, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 54, effective June 26, 2007; renumbered to KRS §

176.5067

by 2021 ch. 190, § 7, effective June 29, 2021.

15A.364.
Responsibilities of Motorcycle Safety Education Commission. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 8, effective July 1, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 55, effective June 26, 2007; renumbered to KRS §

176.5068

by 2021 ch. 190, § 8, effective June 29, 2021.

15A.366.
Annual report — Submitted to Governor and Legislative Research Commission and available for public review. [Renumbered]

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 122, § 9, effective July 1, 2005; renumbered to KRS §

176.5069

by 2021 ch. 190, § 9, effective June 29, 2021.

15A.370.
Department of Kentucky Vehicle Enforcement — Employees may be commissioned as peace officers — Enforcement powers — Divisions in department. [Repealed.]

15A.371.
Charges against commissioned employees — Procedure — Hearing. [Repealed.]

15A.372.
Trial board for hearings on charges against commissioned employees — Right to hearing — Appeals. [Repealed.]